Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2239
Sheriffs; neglect of duty; penalty; how recovered.

Sheriffs shall be liable to twenty percent penalty upon the amount of damages for which judgment may be entered against them for failing to make return, making false return, or failing to pay over money collected or received in his or her official capacity. Such judgment must include, in addition to the damages and costs, the penalty herein provided.

Laws 1929, c. 82, art. XV, § 180, p. 325;

C.S.1929, § 22-1510;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,181;

R.S.1943, (1979), § 26-1,181;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-5,104;

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 21.